Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB781.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 230 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Any track licensed by the corporation to conduct live horse racing or races
previously run shall implement a program to promote responsible gambling by its
patrons and provide details of the same to the corporation. At a minimum, the
program shall require:
(a) Posting in a conspicuous location, in every place where pari-mutuel
wagering on historical horse racing is conducted, a sign that bears a toll-
free telephone number approved by the Kentucky Council on Problem
Gambling or other organization that provides assistance to problem
gamblers;
(b) Providing informational leaflets or other similar materials on its licensed
premises on the dangers associated with problem gambling;
(c) Including in the licensee's promotional and marketing materials
information on problem gambling and organizations that provide assistance
to problem gamblers;
(d) Routine auditing of patron activity to identify patrons who have suffered
significant financial losses in repeated visits to its licensed premises and
providing such patrons with information on organizations that provide
assistance to problem gamblers;
(e) Training for employees at licensed tracks that also hold a license issued
under KRS 243.265 to identify patrons who have consumed excessive
amounts of alcohol to prevent such patrons from continuing to engage in
wagering activity while impaired;
(f) Forming a partnership with the Kentucky Council on Problem Gambling,
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 2/14/2025 2:56 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1859
the National Council on Problem Gambling, or other similar organization
to identify and promote best practices for preventing problem gambling; and
(g) Training for all employees who have contact with patrons, as well as
administrative and corporate staff members, that shall include skills and
procedures to respond to situations where a patron exhibits warning signs
of a gambling problem or where a patron discloses he or she may have a
gambling problem. Employees and staff shall be trained immediately upon
their hiring and retrained and tested regularly.
(2) A licensee shall report annually to the corporation, and make a copy available to
the public, on its efforts to meet the requirements of subsection (1) of this section,
including its efforts to identify problem gamblers and steps taken to:
(a) Prevent such individuals from continuing to engage in pari-mutuel
wagering on historical horse racing; and
(b)_ Provide assistance to these individuals to address problem gambling activity.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 2/14/2025 2:56 PM Jacketed